Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska85-112
University of Nebraska; admission requirements; powers of Board of Regents.

Students seeking admission to any postsecondary educational institution governed by the Board of Regents or to any college or school of any such institution shall, precedent to admission, complete such requirements as may be prescribed or authorized by the Board of Regents.

Laws 1869, § 15, p. 176;

G.S.1873, c. 78, § 15, p. 1053;

R.S.1913, § 7093;

C.S.1922, § 6725;

C.S.1929, § 85-112;

Laws 1939, c. 137, § 1, p. 585;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 85-112;

R.S.1943, § 85-112;

Laws 2003, LB 68, § 4.